Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

General Provisions

6-21-101. Appointment and removal of city manager.

The board of commissioners shall appoint and fix the salary of the city manager, who shall serve at the will of the board.

The city manager may not be removed within twelve (12) months from the date on which the city manager assumed the duties of the city manager, except for incompetence, malfeasance, misfeasance, or neglect of duty.

In case of the city manager's removal within that period, the city manager may demand written charges and a public hearing thereon before the board prior to the date on which final removal shall take effect. The decision and action of the board on such hearing shall be final, and pending such hearing, the board may suspend the city manager from duty.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 7, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a157; Code 1932, § 3554; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal Corporations, § 63.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of city manager and commissioners under city manager-commission charter. OAG 11-11, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/19/11).

6-21-102. Subordinate officers and employees.

The city manager may appoint, promote, suspend, transfer and remove any officer or employee of the city responsible to the city manager; or the city manager may, in the city manager's discretion, authorize the head of a department or office responsible to the city manager to take such actions regarding subordinates in such department or office. The city manager shall appoint such heads of administrative offices or organizational units as the city manager deems necessary. The city manager may combine, or personally hold, any such administrative offices established pursuant to this subsection (a) or otherwise established or may delegate parts of the duties of the city manager's office to designated subordinates.

Except as otherwise provided in this charter, the compensation of all officers and employees of the city shall be fixed by the city manager within the limits of the appropriations ordinance and in accordance with a comprehensive pay plan adopted by the board of commissioners.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 7, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a158; Code 1932, § 3555; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2102; Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 11.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of city manager and commissioners under city manager-commission charter. OAG 11-11, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/19/11).

6-21-103. Oath of office.

Every officer, agent, and employee holding a position upon an annual salary shall, before entering upon such person's duties, take and subscribe and file with the recorder, an oath or affirmation that such person has all the qualifications named in this charter for the office or employment such person is about to assume, that such person will support the constitutions of the United States and of this state and the charter and ordinances of the city and will faithfully discharge the duties of the office or employment.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 7, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1997a159; Code 1932, § 3556; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2103.

6-21-104. Surety bond.

The city manager and every officer, agent, and employee having duties embracing the receipt, disbursement, custody, or handling of money shall, before entering upon these duties, execute a fidelity bond with some surety company authorized to do business in the state, as surety, except that bonds for five hundred dollars ($500) or less may be given with personal surety, in such amount as shall be prescribed by ordinance of the board of commissioners, except where the amount is prescribed in this charter. All such bonds and sureties thereto shall be subject to the approval of the board of commissioners. The cost of making these bonds is to be paid by the city.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 7, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1997a160; Code 1932, § 3557; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2104.

6-21-105. Additional bond.

If, at any time, it appears to the mayor, city manager, or recorder that the surety or sureties on any official bond are insufficient, the officer or employee shall be required to give additional bond, and if such officer or employee fails to give additional bond within twenty (20) days after being notified, the officer or employee's office shall be vacant.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 7, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 1997a161; Code 1932, § 3558; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2105.

6-21-106. Political activities of officers and employees — Penalties.

Neither the city manager, recorder, city judge, chief of police nor any person in the employ of the city, under any of such officers, shall take any active part in or contribute any money toward the nomination or election of any candidate for election to the board of commissioners, except to answer such questions as may be put to them and as they may desire to answer.

A violation of this section shall subject the offenders to removal from office or employment, and to punishment by fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 22, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1997a246; Code 1932, § 3644; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2106.

6-21-107. Manager as administrative head — Absence — Time devoted to office.

In addition to all other powers conferred upon the city manager, the city manager shall be the administrative head of the municipal government under the direction and supervision of the board of commissioners. The city manager shall be appointed without regard to the city manager's political beliefs and need not be a resident of the city or state at the time of appointment.

During the absence or disability of the city manager, the board of commissioners may designate some properly qualified person to perform the functions of the city manager.

The city manager shall not be required to give the city manager's entire time to the affairs of the city, unless the city commissioners, when employing the city manager, make the employment conditional upon the city manager's devoting the city manager's entire time to the interest of the city.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 8, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1997a162; Code 1932, § 3559; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2107.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of city manager and commissioners under city manager-commission charter. OAG 11-11, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/19/11).

6-21-108. Powers and duties of manager.

The powers and duties of the city manager are to:

See that the laws and ordinances are enforced, and upon knowledge or information of any violation thereof, see that prosecutions are instituted in the city court;

Except as otherwise provided in this charter, appoint, promote, demote, suspend, transfer, remove, and otherwise discipline all department heads and subordinate employees at any time, subject only to any personnel rules and regulations adopted by ordinance or resolution by the commission. Any hearings on, or appeals from, the city manager's personnel decisions provided for in the personnel rules and regulations shall be exclusively before the city manager or a hearing officer designated by the city manager;

Supervise and control the work of the recorder, the chief of police, the city attorney, treasurer, and all other officers, and of all departments and divisions created by this charter or that hereafter may be created by the board of commissioners;

See that all terms and conditions imposed in favor of the city or its inhabitants in any public utility or franchise are faithfully done, kept and performed, and, upon knowledge or information of any violation thereof, call the same to the attention of the city attorney, who is hereby required to take such steps as are necessary to enforce the same;

Attend all meetings of the board, with the right to take part in the discussion, but not to vote;

Recommend to the board for adoption such measures as the city manager deems necessary or expedient;

Act as budget commissioner and keep the board fully advised as to the financial condition and need of the city;

Act as purchasing agent for the city and purchase all material, supplies and equipment for the proper conduct of the city's business as provided in § 6-19-104;

Execute contracts on behalf of the city when this authority is delegated to the city manager by ordinance; and

Perform such other duties as may be prescribed by this charter or required of the city manager by resolution or ordinance of the board.

Acts 1921, ch. 173, art. 8, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1997a163; Code 1932, § 3560; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2108; Acts 1989, ch. 175, § 12; 1995, ch. 13, § 11; 1999, ch. 270, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of city manager and commissioners under city manager-commission charter. OAG 11-11, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 11 (1/19/11).